Utah statutes.
61-2g-503.   Reinstatement of license, certification, and registration.

(1)  An individual whose license, certification, or registration is revoked under this chapter:

(a)  may not apply for renewal or reinstatement of that license, certification, or registration; and

(b)  may apply for licensure, certification, or registration as prescribed for an original license, certification, or registration subject to the limitations in Subsection (2).

(2)  An applicant for licensure, certification, or registration under Subsection (1) is not entitled to credit for experience gained before the date of revocation in determining whether the applicant meets the experience requirement for licensure, certification, or registration.



Amended by Chapter 166, 2012 General Session

